Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1369.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 6337 and 6338(b) and (c) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 6337. Disposition and expunction of unfounded reports and general protective services reports.(a) [General rule] Expunction in general.--When a report of suspected child abuse is determined by the appropriate county agency to be an unfounded report, the information concerning that report of suspected child abuse shall be maintained for a period of [one year] 30 years. Following the expiration of [one year] 30 years after the date the report was received by the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 department, the report shall be expunged from the Statewide database, as soon as possible, but no later than 120 days after the [one-year] 30-year period following the date the report was received by the department, and no information other than that authorized by subsection (b), which shall not include any identifying information on any subject of the report, shall be retained by the department. The expunction shall be mandated and guaranteed by the department.(b) Absence of other determination.--If an investigation of a report of suspected child abuse conducted by the appropriate county agency pursuant to this chapter does not determine within 60 days of the date of the initial report of the instance of suspected child abuse that the report is a founded report, an indicated report or an unfounded report, or unless within that same 60-day period court action has been initiated and is responsible for the delay, the report shall be considered to be an unfounded report, and all information identifying the subjects of the report shall be expunged no later than 120 days following the expiration of [one year] 30 years after the date the report was received by the department. The agency shall advise the department that court action or an arrest has been initiated so that the Statewide database is kept current regarding the status of all legal proceedings and expunction is delayed.(c) Unfounded reports accepted for services.--Information on an unfounded report shall be retained in the Statewide database if the county agency has accepted the family for services and the report of suspected child abuse is clearly identified as an unfounded report. The county agency shall notify the department immediately upon closure of the case, and the report shall be 20250HB1369PN1563 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expunged as soon as possible, but no later than 120 days after the [one-year] 30-year period following the date the family case was closed. [If the subject child of the unfounded report becomes 23 years of age prior to the closure of the family case, the unfounded report shall be expunged when the subject child reaches 23 years of age.](d) Expunction of valid general protective services reports.--Information concerning valid general protective services reports shall be maintained in the Statewide database as follows:(1) Reports that are assessed by the county agency and are determined to be valid, but are not accepted for services, shall be reported to the department and entered into the Statewide database. The reports shall be maintained for a period of [ten] 30 years [or until the youngest child identified in the most recent general protective services report attains 23 years of age, whichever occurs first]. Following the expiration of [ten] 30 years after the date the report was received by the department [or until the youngest child identified in the most recent general protective services report attains 23 years of age, whichever occurs first], the report shall be expunged from the Statewide database as soon as possible, but no later than 120 days after the [ten-year] 30-year period following the date the report was received by the department [or the youngest child identified in the most recent general protective services report attains 23 years of age, whichever occurs first].(2) Reports that are assessed by the county agency and accepted for services shall be reported to the department, except as otherwise provided in subsection (f)(2), and 20250HB1369PN1563 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entered into the Statewide database. The reports shall be maintained for a period of [ten] 30 years after the closure of services by the county agency [or until the youngest child identified in the most recent general protective services report attains 23 years of age, whichever occurs first]. Following the expiration of [ten] 30 years after the closure of services by the county agency [or until the youngest child identified in the most recent general protective services report attains 23 years of age, whichever occurs first], the report shall be expunged from the Statewide database as soon as possible, but no later than 120 days after the [ten-year] 30-year period following the closure of services by the county agency [or the youngest child identified in the most recent general protective services report attains 23 years of age, whichever occurs first].(3) The expunction of information on general protective services under this subsection shall be mandated and guaranteed by the department.(e) Expunction of invalid general protective services reports.--When a report alleging the need for general protective services is determined by the appropriate county agency to be an invalid report, the information concerning that report shall be maintained for a period of [one year] 30 years. Following the expiration of [one year] 30 years after the date the report was received by the department, the report shall be expunged as soon as possible, but no later than 120 days after the [one-year] 30-year period following the date the report was received by the department. The expunction shall be mandated and guaranteed by the department.(f) County agency records.--Information concerning 20250HB1369PN1563 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protective services reports shall be maintained by a county agency as follows:(1) County agency records of protective services shall be used and maintained in a manner that is consistent with the use and maintenance of information in the Statewide database, as provided under this chapter, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2). If required under this chapter to amend or expunge information in the Statewide database, the department shall notify the appropriate county agency of the amendment or expungement within ten days. The county agency shall amend or expunge its records in a commensurate manner within ten days of receiving notification from the department.(2) A county agency may maintain information regarding protective services reports that have been expunged in the Statewide database for access by the county agency to assist in future risk and safety assessments and research.§ 6338. Disposition of founded and indicated reports.* * *[(b) Expunction of information when child attains 23 years of age.--Except as provided in subsection (c), all information which identifies the subjects of founded and indicated child abuse reports shall be expunged when the subject child reaches the age of 23. The expunction shall be mandated and guaranteed by the department.](c) Retention of information.--The Statewide database shall indefinitely retain the names of perpetrators of child abuse and school employees who are subjects of unfounded, founded or indicated reports only if the individual's Social Security number or date of birth is known to the department. [The entry 20250HB1369PN1563 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the Statewide database shall not include identifying information regarding other subjects of the report.]Section 2. Section 6338.1 of Title 23 is repealed:[§ 6338.1. Expunction of information of perpetrator who was under 18 years of age when child abuse was committed.(a) General rule.--The name of a perpetrator who is the subject of an indicated report of child abuse and who was under 18 years of age when the individual committed child abuse shall be expunged from the Statewide database when the individual reaches 21 years of age or when five years have elapsed since the perpetrator's name was added to the database, whichever is later, if the individual meets all of the following:(1) The individual has not been named as a perpetrator in any subsequent indicated report of child abuse and is not named as an alleged perpetrator in a child abuse report pending investigation.(2) The individual has never been convicted or adjudicated delinquent following a determination by the court that the individual committed an offense under section 6344(c) (relating to employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents), and no proceeding is pending seeking such conviction or adjudication.(3) The child abuse which resulted in the inclusion of the perpetrator's name in the database did not involve the use of a deadly weapon, as defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2301 (relating to definitions).(b) Mandated expunction.--If the perpetrator meets all of the requirements under subsection (a), the expunction shall be mandated and guaranteed by the department.(c) Nonapplicability.--The provisions of this section shall 20250HB1369PN1563 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not apply to any of the following cases:(1) A perpetrator who is the subject of a founded report of child abuse.(2) A sexually violent delinquent child, as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.12 (relating to definitions), who meets all of the following:(i) Is required to register under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H (relating to registration of sexual offenders).(ii) Was found delinquent as a result of the same acts which resulted in the sexually violent delinquent child being named a perpetrator of child abuse.(3) A juvenile offender, as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.12, who meets all of the following:(i) Is required to register under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H as a result of an adjudication of delinquency for the same acts which resulted in the juvenile offender being named a perpetrator of child abuse.(ii) Has not been removed from the Statewide Registry of Sexual Offenders pursuant to 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.17 (relating to termination of period of registration for juvenile offenders).(4) An individual who:(i) Is required to register under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H or I (relating to continued registration of sexual offenders) as a result of a criminal conviction for the same acts which resulted in the sexual offender being named a perpetrator of child abuse.(ii) Has not completed the period of registration required under 42 Pa.C.S. Subch. H or I.]Section 3. Sections 6340(d), 6341 heading, (a), (b), (c), 20250HB1369PN1563 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) and (f), 6368(f)(6) and 6381(a) of Title 23 are amended to read:§ 6340. Release of information in confidential reports.* * *(d) Exclusion of information.--Except as provided under section 6341(c.2)(4) (relating to amendment [or expunction] of information), information maintained in the Statewide database obtained from an investigating agency in relation to an appeal request shall not be released to any person except a department official. Information in the Statewide database or a confidential report provided under section 6341(c.2)(4) shall be subject to subsection (c).§ 6341. Amendment [or expunction] of information.(a) [General rule] Amendment.--Notwithstanding [section 6338.1 (relating to expunction of information of perpetrator who was under 18 years of age when child abuse was committed)] the provisions of this chapter:(1) At any time, the secretary may amend [or expunge] any record in the Statewide database under this chapter upon good cause shown and notice to the appropriate subjects of the report. The request shall be in writing in a manner prescribed by the department. For purposes of this paragraph, good cause shall include, but is not limited to, [the following:(i) Newly] newly discovered evidence that an indicated report of child abuse is inaccurate or is being maintained in a manner inconsistent with this chapter.[(ii) A determination that the perpetrator in an indicated report of abuse no longer represents a risk of child abuse and that no significant public purpose would 20250HB1369PN1563 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be served by the continued listing of the person as a perpetrator in the Statewide database.](2) Any person named as a perpetrator, and any school employee named, in an indicated report of child abuse may, within 90 days of being notified of the status of the report, request an administrative review by, or appeal and request a hearing before, the secretary to amend [or expunge] an indicated report on the grounds that it is inaccurate or it is being maintained in a manner inconsistent with this chapter. The request shall be in writing in a manner prescribed by the department.(3) Within 60 days of a request under paragraph (1) or a request for administrative review under paragraph (2), the department shall send notice of the secretary's decision.(b) Review of grant of request.--If the secretary grants the request under subsection (a)(2), the Statewide database, appropriate county agency, appropriate law enforcement officials and all subjects shall be so advised of the decision. The county agency and any subject have 90 days in which to file an administrative appeal with the secretary. If an administrative appeal is received, the secretary or his designated agent shall schedule a hearing pursuant to Article IV of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Public Welfare Code, attending departmental regulations. If no administrative appeal is received within the designated time period, the Statewide database shall comply with the decision of the secretary and advise the county agency to amend [or expunge] the information in their records so that the records are consistent at both the State and local levels.(c) Review of refusal of request.--Subject to subsection 20250HB1369PN1563 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c.1), if the secretary refuses a request under subsection (a)(1) or a request for administrative review under subsection (a)(2), or does not act within the prescribed time, the perpetrator or school employee shall have the right to appeal and request a hearing before the secretary to amend [or expunge] an indicated report on the grounds that it is inaccurate or it is being maintained in a manner inconsistent with this chapter. The request for hearing must be made within 90 days of notice of the decision. The appropriate county agency and appropriate law enforcement officials shall be given notice of the hearing. The burden of proof in the hearing shall be on the appropriate county agency. The department shall assist the county agency as necessary.* * *(e) Order.--The secretary or designated agent may make any appropriate order respecting the amendment [or expunction] of such records to make them accurate or consistent with the requirements of this chapter.(f) Notice of expunction.--Written notice of an expunction of any child abuse record made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be served upon the subject of the record who was responsible for the abuse or injury and the appropriate county agency. Except as provided in this subsection, the county agency, upon receipt of the notice, shall take appropriate, similar action in regard to the local child abuse records and inform, for the same purpose, the appropriate coroner if that officer has received reports pursuant to section 6367 (relating to reports to department and coroner). Whenever the county agency investigation reveals, within 60 days of receipt of the report of suspected child abuse, that the report is unfounded 20250HB1369PN1563 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 but that the subjects need services provided or arranged by the county agency, the county agency shall retain those records and shall specifically identify that the report was an unfounded report of suspected child abuse. An unfounded report regarding subjects who receive services shall be expunged no later than 120 days following the expiration of [one year] 30 years after the termination or completion of services provided or arranged by the county agency.* * *§ 6368. Investigation of reports.* * *(f) Final determination.--Immediately upon conclusion of the child abuse investigation, the county agency shall provide the results of its investigation to the department in a manner prescribed by the department. Within three business days of receipt of the results of the investigation from the county agency, the department shall send notice of the final determination to the subjects of the report, other than the abused child. The determination shall include the following information:* * *(6) The perpetrator's right to file an appeal of an indicated finding of abuse pursuant to section 6341 (relating to amendment [or expunction] of information) within 90 days of the date of notice.* * *§ 6381. Evidence in court proceedings.(a) [General rule] Rule of evidence.--In addition to the rules of evidence provided under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters), the rules of evidence in this section shall 20250HB1369PN1563 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 govern in child abuse proceedings in court or in any department administrative hearing pursuant to section 6341 (relating to amendment [or expunction] of information).* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1369PN1563 - 12 - 12345